bg-BG: Система на клапите на саксофона: Система Бьом (стандартна); Друго
fi: Saksofonin kosketinjärjestelmä: Boehm-järjestelmä (vakio); Muu
pl: System klap saksofonu: System Boehma (standardowy); Inny
en: Saxophone key system: Boehm system (standard); Other
sv: Saxofonens klaviatursystem: Boehm-system (standard); Övrigt
vi: Hệ thống phím kèn saxophone: Hệ thống Boehm (tiêu chuẩn); Khác
pt-PT: Sistema de chaves do saxofone: Sistema Boehm (padrão); Outro
cs: Systém kláves saxofonu: Boehmův systém (standardní); Jiné
da: Saxofons klapsystem: Böhm-system (standard); Andet
sk-SK: Systém klapiek saxofónu: Boehmov systém (štandardný); Iné
zh-TW: 薩克斯風按鍵系統: 貝姆指法系統 (標準); 其他
de: Klappensystem des Saxophons: Böhm-System (Standard); Sonstige
ru: Клапанная система саксофона: Система Бема (стандартная); Другая
es: Sistema de llaves del saxofón: Sistema Boehm (estándar); Otro
ro-RO: Sistem de clape pentru saxofon: Sistem Boehm (standard); Altele
zh-CN: 萨克斯管按键系统: 波姆体系（标准）; 其他
el: Σύστημα πλήκτρων σαξοφώνου: Σύστημα Boehm (τυπικό); Άλλο
nb: Saksofonnøkkelsystem: Boehm-system (standard); Annet
ko: 색소폰 키 체계: 뵘 시스템(표준); 기타
fr: Système de clés du saxophone: Système Boehm (standard); Autre
nl: Saxofoon kleppensysteem: Böhm-systeem (standaard); Overige
hu: Szaxofon billentyűrendszere: Boehm-rendszer (szabványos); Egyéb
hr-HR: Sustav tipki saksofona: Boehmov sustav (standardni); Ostalo
ja: サックスのキーシステム: ベーム式 (標準); その他
sl-SI: Sistem zaklopk (mehanizma) saksofona: Boehmov sistem (standardni); Drugo
pt-BR: Saxofone sistema de chaves: Sistema Boehm (padrão); Outros
tr: Saksafon tuş sistemi: Boehm sistemi (standart); Diğer
it: Sistema di tasti del sassofono: Sistema Boehm (standard); Altro
lt-LT: Saksofono klavišų sistema: Bemo sistema (standartinė); Kita
th: ระบบคีย์แซ็กโซโฟน: ระบบโบห์ม(มาตรฐาน); อื่นๆ